Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1166.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Section 15-305, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-305. Accommodation schools; optional high school equivalency preparation instruction; requirements; definition A. A county school superintendent may offer high school equivalency preparation instruction through an accommodation school to students who are enrolled in the accommodation school in grade either of grades eleven or twelve, subject to the following requirements: 1. The student is at least sixteen years of age. 1. 2. Before providing high school equivalency preparation instruction pursuant to this section, the county school superintendent shall obtain written consent from the student's parent or, if emancipated, the student. 2. 3. Each student who participates in high school equivalency preparation instruction pursuant to this section must also be enrolled in a career and technical education course or program that leads to a certification, license or credential. B. For the purposes of this section, "high school equivalency preparation instruction" means instruction that prepares students to pass the equivalency test adopted by the state board of education pursuant to section 15-702. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 7, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 7, 2026.